Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2910
Contractor; post notice.

Every contractor
shall post in a conspicuous place at the job site or place of business in
English and Spanish the following notice:

(1) Every individual
working for a contractor has the right to be properly classified by the contractor
as an employee rather than an independent contractor if the individual does
not meet the requirements of an independent contractor under the law known
as the Employee Classification Act.

(2) If you believe you or someone else has
not been properly classified as an employee or an independent contractor under
the Employee Classification Act, contact the Department of Labor.

Laws 2010, LB563, § 10.